California statutes. Code of Civil Procedure
 of costs of the party paying them, recoverable by that party if that party prevails in the action. Otherwise, those costs and fees shall be offset against and deducted from the amount, if any, awarded to the plaintiff if the plaintiff prevails against that party in the action. The cause of action shall not be further prosecuted in any court until those costs and fees are paid. If those costs and fees are not paid within 30 days after service of notice of the transfer order, if a copy of a petition for writ of mandate pursuant to Section 400 is filed in the trial court, or if an appeal is taken pursuant to Section 904.2, then, within 30 days after notice of finality of the order of transfer, the court on a duly noticed motion by any party may dismiss the action without prejudice to the cause on the condition that no other action on the cause may be commenced in another court before satisfaction of the court’s order for costs and fees. If a petition for writ of mandate or appeal does not result in a stay of
 proceedings, the time for payment of those costs and fees shall be 60 days after service of the notice of the order.

(b) At the time of transmittal of the papers and pleadings, the clerk shall mail notice to all parties who have appeared in the action or special proceeding, stating the date on which the transmittal occurred. Promptly upon receipt of the papers and pleadings, the clerk of the court to which the action or proceeding is transferred shall mail notice to all parties who have appeared in the action or special proceeding, stating the date of the filing of the case and number assigned to the case in the court.

(c) The court to which an action or proceeding is transferred under this title shall have and exercise over the action or proceeding the like jurisdiction as if it had been originally commenced in that court, all prior proceedings being saved, and the court may
 require amendment of the pleadings, the filing and service of amended, additional, or supplemental pleadings, and the giving of notice, as may be necessary for the proper presentation and determination of the action or proceeding in the court.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (c), the court transferring jurisdiction of a family law action or proceeding pursuant to Section 397, 397.5, or 398 shall, if another court has not assumed jurisdiction over the action or proceeding, retain jurisdiction to make orders designed to prevent:

(1) Immediate danger or irreparable harm to a party or to the children involved in the matter.

(2) Immediate loss or damage to property subject to disposition in the matter.

(e) By January 1, 2019, the Judicial Council shall, by
 rule of court, establish:

(1) The timeframe for a court to transfer jurisdiction over a family law action or proceeding.

(2) The timeframe for a court to assume jurisdiction over a family law action or proceeding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 853, Sec. 19.   (AB 3281)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

400.

When an order is made by the superior court granting or denying a motion to change the place of trial, the party aggrieved by the order may, within 20 days after service of a written notice of the order, petition the court of appeal for the district in which the court granting or denying the motion is situated for a writ of mandate requiring trial of the case in the proper court. The superior court may, for good cause, and prior to the expiration of the initial 20-day period, extend the time for one additional period not to exceed 10 days. The petitioner shall
 file a copy of the petition in the trial court immediately after the petition is filed in the court of appeal. The court of appeal may stay all proceedings in the case, pending judgment on the petition becoming final. The clerk of the court of appeal shall file with the clerk of the trial court, a copy of any final order or final judgment immediately after the order or judgment becomes final.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 344, Sec. 10.   Effective September 7, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

401.

(1) Whenever it is provided by any law of this State that an action or proceeding against the State or a department, institution, board, commission, bureau, officer or other agency thereof shall or may be commenced in, tried in, or removed to the County of Sacramento, the same may be commenced and tried in any city or city and county of this State in which the Attorney General has an office.

(2) Whenever it is provided by any law of this State that the State or a department, institution, board, commission, bureau, officer or other agency thereof shall or may commence an action or proceeding
 in the County of Sacramento, the same, on motion of the defendants or some of them, shall be removed for trial to the county or city and county in which the Attorney General has an office nearest to the county in which the defendants or some of them reside or have their principal office in this State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 306.)
-------------------------------------------

402.

(a) Except as otherwise provided by law:

(1) A superior court may specify by local rule the locations where certain types of actions or proceedings are to be filed.

(2) A superior court may specify by local rule the locations where certain types of actions or proceedings are to be heard or tried.

(3) A superior court may not dismiss a case, and the
 clerk may not reject a case for filing, because it is filed, or a person seeks to file it, in a court location other than the location specified by local rule. However, the court may transfer the case on its own motion to the proper court location.

(b) A superior court may transfer an action or proceeding filed in one location to another location of the superior court. This section does not affect the authority of the presiding judge to apportion the business of the court as provided by the California Rules of Court.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 806, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

403.

A judge may, on motion, transfer an action or actions from another court to that judge’s court for coordination with an action involving a common question of fact or law within the meaning of Section 404. The motion shall be supported by a declaration stating facts showing that the actions meet the standards specified in Section 404.1, are not complex as defined by the Judicial Council and that the moving party has made a good faith effort to obtain agreement to the transfer from all parties to each action. Notice of the motion shall be served on all parties to
 each action and on each court in which an action is pending. Any party to that action may file papers opposing the motion within the time permitted by rule of the Judicial Council. The court to which a case is transferred may order the cases consolidated for trial pursuant to Section 1048 without any further motion or hearing.

The Judicial Council may adopt rules to implement this section, including rules prescribing procedures for preventing duplicative or conflicting transfer orders issued by different courts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 784, Sec. 55.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Reclassification of Civil Actions and Proceedings [403.010. - 403.090.]

403.010.

Nothing in this chapter expands or limits the law on whether a plaintiff, cross-complainant, or petitioner may file an amended complaint or other amended initial pleading. Nothing in this chapter expands or limits the law on whether, and to what extent, an amendment relates back to the date of filing the original complaint or other initial pleading.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 784, Sec. 56.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

403.020.

(a) If a plaintiff, cross-complainant, or petitioner files an amended complaint or other amended initial pleading that changes the jurisdictional classification from limited to unlimited, the party at the time of filing the pleading shall pay the reclassification fee provided in Section 403.060, and the clerk shall promptly reclassify the case. If the amendment changes the jurisdictional classification from unlimited to limited, no reclassification fee is required, and the clerk shall promptly reclassify the case.

(b) For purposes of this chapter, an amendment to an initial pleading shall be treated in the same manner as an amended initial pleading.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 824, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

403.030.

If a party in a limited civil case files a cross-complaint that causes the action or proceeding to exceed the maximum amount in controversy for a limited civil case or otherwise fail to satisfy the requirements for a limited civil case as prescribed by Section 85, the caption of the cross-complaint shall state that the action or proceeding is a limited civil case to be reclassified by cross-complaint, or words to that effect. The party at the time of filing the cross-complaint shall pay the reclassification fees provided in Section 403.060, and the clerk
 shall promptly reclassify the case.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 824, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

403.040.

(a) The plaintiff, cross-complainant, or petitioner may file a motion for reclassification within the time allowed for that party to amend the initial pleading. The defendant or cross-defendant may file a motion for reclassification within the time allowed for that party to respond to the initial pleading. The court, on its own motion, may reclassify a case at any time. A motion for reclassification does not extend the moving party’s time to amend or answer or otherwise respond. The court shall grant the motion and enter an order for
 reclassification, regardless of any fault or lack of fault, if the case has been classified in an incorrect jurisdictional classification.

(b) If a party files a motion for reclassification after the time for that party to amend that party’s initial pleading or to respond to a complaint, cross-complaint, or other initial pleading, the court shall grant the motion and enter an order for reclassification only if both of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The case is incorrectly classified.

(2) The moving party shows good cause for not seeking reclassification earlier.

(c) If the court grants a motion for reclassification, the payment of the reclassification fee shall be determined, unless the court orders otherwise, as follows:

(1) If a case is reclassified as an unlimited civil case, the party whose pleading causes the action or proceeding to exceed the maximum amount in controversy for a limited civil case or otherwise fails to satisfy the requirements of a limited civil case under Section 85 shall pay the reclassification fee provided in Section 403.060.

(2) If a case is reclassified as a limited civil case, no reclassification fee is required.

(d) If the court grants an order for reclassification of an action or proceeding pursuant to this section, the reclassification shall proceed as follows:

(1) If the required reclassification fee is paid pursuant to Section 403.060 or no reclassification fee is required, the clerk shall promptly reclassify the case.

(2) An action that has been reclassified pursuant to this section shall not be further prosecuted in any court until the required reclassification fee is paid. If the required reclassification fee has not been paid within five days after service of notice of the order for reclassification, any party interested in the case, regardless of whether that party is named in the complaint, may pay the fee, and the clerk shall promptly reclassify the case as if the fee had been paid as provided in Section 403.060. The fee shall then be a proper item of costs of the party paying it, recoverable if that party prevails in the action or proceeding. Otherwise, the fee shall be offset against and deducted from the amount, if any, awarded to the party responsible for the fee, if that party prevails in the action or proceeding.

(3) If the fee is not paid within 30 days after service of notice of an
 order of reclassification, the court on its own motion or the motion of any party may order the case to proceed as a limited civil case, dismiss the action or cross-action without prejudice on the condition that no other action or proceeding on the same matters may be commenced in any other court until the reclassification fee is paid, or take such other action as the court may deem appropriate.

(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the superior court to reclassify an action or proceeding because the judgment to be rendered, as determined at the trial or hearing, is one that might have been rendered in a limited civil case.

(f) In any case where the misclassification is due solely to an excess in the amount of the demand, the excess may be remitted and the action may continue as a limited civil case.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 824, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

403.050.

(a) The parties to the action or proceeding may stipulate to reclassification of the case within the time allowed to respond to the initial pleading.

(b) If the stipulation for reclassification changes the jurisdictional classification of the case from limited to unlimited, the reclassification fee provided in Section 403.060 shall be paid at the time the stipulation is filed.

(c) Upon filing of the stipulation
 and, if required under subdivision (b), the payment of the reclassification fee provided in Section 403.060, the clerk shall promptly reclassify the case.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 824, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

403.060.

(a) For reclassification of a case from a limited civil case to an unlimited civil case, a fee shall be charged as provided in Section 70619 of the Government Code. This reclassification fee shall be in addition to any other fee due for that appearance or filing in a limited civil case. No additional amounts shall be charged for appearance or filing fees paid prior to reclassification. After reclassification, the fees ordinarily charged in an unlimited case shall be charged.

(b) If a reclassification fee is required and is not paid at the time an amended complaint or other initial pleading, a cross-complaint, or a stipulation for reclassification is filed under Section 403.020, 403.030, or 403.050, the clerk shall not reclassify the case and the case shall remain and proceed as a limited civil case.

(c) No fee shall be charged for reclassification of a case from an unlimited civil case to a limited civil case. The fees ordinarily required for filing or appearing in a limited civil case shall be charged at the time of filing a pleading that reclassifies the case. Parties are not entitled to a refund of the difference between any fees previously paid for appearance or filing in an unlimited civil case and the fees due in a limited civil case. After reclassification, the fees ordinarily charged in a limited civil case shall be charged.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 75, Sec. 29.   Effective July 19, 2005.   Operative January 1, 2006, by Sec. 156 of Ch. 75.)
-------------------------------------------

403.070.

(a) An action or proceeding that is reclassified shall be deemed to have been commenced at the time the complaint or petition was initially filed, not at the time of reclassification.

(b) The court shall have and exercise over the reclassified action or proceeding the same authority as if the action or proceeding had been originally commenced as reclassified, all prior proceedings being saved. The court may allow or require whatever amendment of the pleadings, filing and
 service of amended, additional, or supplemental pleadings, or giving of notice, or other appropriate action, as may be necessary for the proper presentation and determination of the action or proceeding as reclassified.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 344, Sec. 11.   Effective September 7, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

403.080.

When an order is made by the superior court granting or denying a motion to reclassify an action or proceeding pursuant to Section 403.040, the party aggrieved by the order may, within 20 days after service of a written notice of the order, petition the court of appeal for the district in which the court granting or denying the motion is situated for a writ of mandate requiring proper classification of the action or proceeding pursuant to Section 403.040. The superior court may, for good cause, and prior to the expiration of the initial 20-day period, extend
 the time for one additional period not to exceed 10 days. The petitioner shall file a copy of the petition in the superior court immediately after the petition is filed in the court of appeal. The court of appeal may stay all proceedings in the case, pending judgment on the petition becoming final. The clerk of the court of appeal shall file with the clerk of the superior court, a copy of any final order or final judgment immediately after the order or judgment becomes final.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 344, Sec. 11.   Effective September 7, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

403.090.

The Judicial Council may prescribe rules, not inconsistent with statute, governing the procedure for reclassification of civil actions and proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 344, Sec. 11.   Effective September 7, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Coordination [404. - 404.9.]

404.

When civil actions sharing a common question of fact or law are pending in different courts, a petition for coordination may be submitted to the Chairperson of the Judicial Council, by the presiding judge of any such court, or by any party to one of the actions after obtaining permission from the presiding judge, or by all of the parties plaintiff or defendant in any such action. A petition for coordination, or a motion for permission to submit a petition, shall be supported by a declaration stating facts showing that the actions are complex, as defined by the
 Judicial Council and that the actions meet the standards specified in Section 404.1. On receipt of a petition for coordination, the Chairperson of the Judicial Council may assign a judge to determine whether the actions are complex, and if so, whether coordination of the actions is appropriate, or the Chairperson of the Judicial Council may authorize the presiding judge of a court to assign the matter to judicial officers of the court to make the determination in the same manner as assignments are made in other civil cases.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 784, Sec. 57.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

404.1.

Coordination of civil actions sharing a common question of fact or law is appropriate if one judge hearing all of the actions for all purposes in a selected site or sites will promote the ends of justice taking into account whether the common question of fact or law is predominating and significant to the litigation; the convenience of parties, witnesses, and counsel; the relative development of the actions and the work product of counsel; the efficient utilization of judicial facilities and manpower; the calendar of the courts; the disadvantages of duplicative and inconsistent rulings, orders, or judgments; and, the likelihood of settlement of the actions without further
 litigation should coordination be denied.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1162.)
-------------------------------------------

404.2.

A judge assigned pursuant to Section 404 who determines that coordination is appropriate shall select the reviewing court having appellate jurisdiction if the actions to be coordinated are within the jurisdiction of more than one reviewing court. The assigned judge shall select the reviewing court which will promote the ends of justice as determined under the standards specified in Section 404.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 713, Sec. 4.   Effective September 23, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

404.3.

A judge assigned pursuant to Section 404 who determines that coordination is appropriate shall order the actions coordinated, report that fact to the Chairperson of the Judicial Council, and the Chairperson of the Judicial Council shall either assign a judge to hear and determine the actions in the site or sites the assigned judge finds appropriate or authorize the presiding judge of a court to assign the matter to judicial officers of the court in the same manner as assignments are made in other civil cases.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 784, Sec. 58.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

404.4.

The presiding judge of any court in which there is pending an action sharing a common question of fact or law with actions coordinated pursuant to Section 404, on the court’s own motion or the motion of any party supported by an affidavit stating facts showing that the action meets the standards specified in Section 404.1, or all the parties plaintiff or defendant in any such action, supported by an affidavit stating facts showing that the action meets the standards specified in Section 404.1, may request the judge assigned to hear the coordinated actions for
 an order coordinating the action. Coordination of the action shall be determined under the standards specified in Section 404.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 713, Sec. 6.   Effective September 23, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

404.5.

Pending any determination of whether coordination is appropriate, the judge making that determination may stay any action being considered for, or affecting an action being considered for, coordination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1162.)
-------------------------------------------

404.6.

Within 20 days after service upon him or her of a written notice of entry of an order of the court under this chapter, any party may petition the appropriate reviewing court for a writ of mandate to require the court to make such order as the reviewing court finds appropriate. The superior court may, for good cause, and prior to the expiration of the initial 20-day period, extend the time for one additional period not to exceed 10 days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1416, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

404.7.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Judicial Council shall provide by rule the practice and procedure for coordination of civil actions in convenient courts, including provision for giving notice and presenting evidence.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1162.)
-------------------------------------------

404.8.

Expenses of the assigned judge, other necessary judicial officers and employees, and facilities for cases coordinated under Section 404 shall be paid or reimbursed by the state from funds appropriated to the Judicial Council.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 713, Sec. 7.   Effective September 23, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

404.9.

Any duties of the presiding judge specified in this chapter may be delegated by the presiding judge to another judge of the court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 784, Sec. 59.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 4.5. RECORDING NOTICE OF CERTAIN ACTIONS [405. - 405.61.]



  CHAPTER 1. Definitions and General Provisions [405. - 405.8.]

405.

The definitions in this chapter govern the construction of this title.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 883, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

405.1.

“Claimant” means a party to an action who asserts a real property claim and records a notice of the pendency of the action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 883, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

405.2.

“Notice of pendency of action” or “notice” means a notice of the pendency of an action in which a real property claim is alleged.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 883, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

405.3.

“Probable validity,” with respect to a real property claim, means that it is more likely than not that the claimant will obtain a judgment against the defendant on the claim.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 883, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

405.4.

“Real property claim” means the cause or causes of action in a pleading which would, if meritorious, affect (a) title to, or the right to possession of, specific real property or (b) the use of an easement identified in the pleading, other than an easement obtained pursuant to statute by any regulated public utility.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 883, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

405.5.

This title applies to an action pending in any United States District Court in the same manner that it applies to an action pending in the courts of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 883, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

405.6.

In an action by a public agency in eminent domain pursuant to Title 7 (commencing with Section 1230.010) of Part 3, the issuance, service, and recordation of a notice of pendency of action shall be governed by Section 1250.150 and shall not be subject to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 405.20).

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 883, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

405.7.

Whenever an action is commenced to declare a building uninhabitable, the plaintiff public agency, at the time of filing the complaint, shall record in the office of the recorder of the county in which the building is situated, a notice of the pendency of the action, containing the names of the parties and a description of the real property upon which the building affected by the action is situated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 883, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

405.8.

Nothing in this title precludes any party from seeking an attachment, injunction, or other relief in connection with a real property claim or the expungement of a notice of pending action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 883, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Recordation Service and Filing [405.20. - 405.24.]

405.20.

A party to an action who asserts a real property claim may record a notice of pendency of action in which that real property claim is alleged. The notice may be recorded in the office of the recorder of each county in which all or part of the real property is situated. The notice shall contain the names of all parties to the action and a description of the property affected by the action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 227, Sec. 10.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

405.21.

An attorney of record in an action may sign a notice of pendency of action. Alternatively, a judge of the court in which an action that includes a real property claim is pending may, upon request of a party thereto, approve a notice of pendency of action. A notice of pendency of action shall not be recorded unless (a) it has been signed by the attorney of record, (b) it is signed by a party acting in propria persona and approved by a judge as provided in this section, or (c) the action is subject to Section 405.6.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 146, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

405.22.

Except in actions subject to Section 405.6, the claimant shall, prior to recordation of the notice, cause a copy of the notice to be mailed, by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, to all known addresses of the parties to whom the real property claim is adverse and to all owners of record of the real property affected by the real property claim as shown by the latest county assessment roll. If there is no known address for service on an adverse party or owner, then as to that party or owner a declaration under penalty of perjury to that effect may be recorded instead of the proof of service required above, and the service on that party
 or owner shall not be required. Immediately following recordation, a copy of the notice shall also be filed with the court in which the action is pending. Service shall also be made immediately and in the same manner upon each adverse party later joined in the action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 227, Sec. 11.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

405.23.

Any notice of pendency of action shall be void and invalid as to any adverse party or owner of record unless the requirements of Section 405.22 are met for that party or owner and a proof of service in the form and content specified in Section 1013a has been recorded with the notice of pendency of action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 883, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

405.24.

From the time of recording the notice of pendency of action, a purchaser, encumbrancer, or other transferee of the real property described in the notice shall be deemed to have constructive notice of the pendency of the noticed action as it relates to the real property and only of its pendency against parties not fictitiously named. The rights and interest of the claimant in the property, as ultimately determined in the pending noticed action, shall relate back to the date of the recording of the notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 883, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Expungement and Other Relief [405.30. - 405.39.]

405.30.

At any time after notice of pendency of action has been recorded, any party, or any nonparty with an interest in the real property affected thereby, may apply to the court in which the action is pending to expunge the notice. However, a person who is not a party to the action shall obtain leave to intervene from the court at or before the time the party brings the motion to expunge the notice. Evidence or declarations may be filed with the motion to expunge the notice. The court may permit evidence to be received in the form of oral testimony, and may make any orders it deems just to provide for discovery by any party affected by a motion to expunge the
 notice. The claimant shall have the burden of proof under Sections 405.31 and 405.32.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 883, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

405.31.

In proceedings under this chapter, the court shall order the notice expunged if the court finds that the pleading on which the notice is based does not contain a real property claim. The court shall not order an undertaking to be given as a condition of expunging the notice where the court finds the pleading does not contain a real property claim.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 883, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

405.32.

In proceedings under this chapter, the court shall order that the notice be expunged if the court finds that the claimant has not established by a preponderance of the evidence the probable validity of the real property claim. The court shall not order an undertaking to be given as a condition of expunging the notice if the court finds the claimant has not established the probable validity of the real property claim.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 883, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

405.33.

In proceedings under this chapter, the court shall order that the notice be expunged if the court finds that the real property claim has probable validity, but adequate relief can be secured to the claimant by the giving of an undertaking. The expungement order shall be conditioned upon the giving of the undertaking of such nature and in such amount as will indemnify the claimant for all damages proximately resulting from the expungement which the claimant may incur if the claimant prevails upon the real property claim. In its order conditionally expunging the notice, the court shall set a return date for the moving party to show fulfillment of the condition,
 and if the moving party fails to show fulfillment of the condition on the return day, the court shall deny the motion to expunge without further notice or hearing. Recovery may be had on the undertaking pursuant to Section 996.440.

For purposes only of determining under this section whether the giving of an undertaking will secure adequate relief to the claimant, the presumption of Section 3387 of the Civil Code that real property is unique shall not apply, except in the case of real property improved with a single-family dwelling which the claimant intends to occupy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 883, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

405.34.

Subject to the provisions of Sections 405.31 and 405.32, at any time after a notice of pendency of action has been recorded, and regardless of whether a motion to expunge has been filed, the court may, upon motion by any person with an interest in the property, require the claimant to give the moving party an undertaking as a condition of maintaining the notice in the record title. However, a person who is not a party to the action shall obtain leave to intervene from the court at or before the time the person moves to require an undertaking. The court may permit evidence to be received in the form of oral testimony and may make any orders it deems just to
 provide for discovery by any affected party. An undertaking required pursuant to this section shall be of such nature and in such amount as the court may determine to be just. In its order requiring an undertaking, the court shall set a return date for the claimant to show compliance and if the claimant fails to show compliance on the return date, the court shall order the notice of pendency of action expunged without further notice or hearing.

Recovery on an undertaking required pursuant to this section may be had in an amount not to exceed the undertaking, pursuant to Section 996.440, upon a showing (a) that the claimant did not prevail on the real property claim and (b) that the person seeking recovery suffered damages as a result of the maintenance of the notice. In assessing these damages, the court shall not consider the claimant’s intent or the presence or absence of probable cause.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 883, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

405.35.

No order expunging a notice of pendency of action shall be effective, nor shall it be recorded in the office of any county recorder, until the time within which a petition for writ of mandate may be filed pursuant to Section 405.39 has expired. No order expunging a notice of pendency of action shall be effective, nor shall it be recorded in the office of any county recorder, after a petition for writ of mandate has been timely filed pursuant to Section 405.39, until the proceeding commenced by the petition is finally adjudicated. This section imposes no duty on the county recorder to determine whether the requirements of this section or of any order expunging
 a notice of pendency of action have been met.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 883, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

405.36.

Once a notice of pending action has been expunged, the claimant may not record another notice of pending action as to the affected property without leave of the court in which the action is pending.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 883, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

405.37.

After notice and hearing, for good cause and upon such terms as are just, the court may exonerate or modify any undertaking required by an order issued pursuant to Section 405.33 or 405.34 or pursuant to a stipulation made in lieu of such an order. An order of the court under this section may be made conditional upon the giving of a new undertaking under Section 405.33 or 405.34.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 883, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

405.38.

The court shall direct that the party prevailing on any motion under this chapter be awarded the reasonable attorney’s fees and costs of making or opposing the motion unless the court finds that the other party acted with substantial justification or that other circumstances make the imposition of attorney’s fees and costs unjust.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 883, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

405.39.

No order or other action of the court under this chapter shall be appealable. Any party aggrieved by an order made on a motion under this chapter may petition the proper reviewing court to review the order by writ of mandate. The petition for writ of mandate shall be filed and served within 20 days of service of written notice of the order by the court or any party. The court which issued the order may, within the initial 20-day period, extend the initial 20-day period for one additional period not to exceed 10 days. A copy of the petition for writ of mandate shall be delivered to the clerk of the court which issued the order with a request that it be placed
 in the court file.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 883, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Withdrawal [405.50. - 405.50.]

405.50.

At any time after notice of pendency of an action has been recorded pursuant to this title or other law, the notice may be withdrawn by recording in the office of the recorder in which the notice of pendency was recorded a notice of withdrawal executed by the party who recorded the notice of pendency of action or by the party’s successor in interest. The notice of withdrawal shall be acknowledged.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 883, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Effect of Withdrawal or Expungement of Notice [405.60. - 405.61.]

405.60.

Upon the withdrawal of a notice of pendency of action pursuant to Section 405.50 or upon recordation of a certified copy of an order expunging a notice of pendency of action pursuant to this title, neither the notice nor any information derived from it, prior to the recording of a certified copy of the judgment or decree issued in the action, shall constitute actual or constructive notice of any of the matters contained, claimed, alleged, or contended therein, or of any of the matters related to the action, or create a duty of inquiry in any person thereafter dealing with the affected property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 883, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

405.61.
